Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1306.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 56AHOSPITAL SECURITY GRANT FUNDSec.56A01. Definitions.56A02. Hospital Security Grant Fund.56A03. Administration.56A04. Expiration.§ 56A01. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:123456789101112131415161718 "Commission." The Pennsylvania Commission on Crime and Delinquency."Designated medically underserved area." As defined in section 1301 of the act of December 2, 1992 (P.L.741, No.113), known as the Children's Health Care Act."Eligible applicant." A nonprofit hospital."Eligible project." Security enhancements designed to protect the safety and security of the patients, employers, visitors and users of a hospital located in this Commonwealth."Fund." The Hospital Security Grant Fund established under section 56A02 (relating to Hospital Security Grant Fund)."Hospital." A health care facility licensed as a hospital by the Department of Health under the act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act."Indirect costs." Costs charged to a grant recipient under this chapter which do not exceed the recipient's federally negotiated indirect cost rate or the Federal de minimis rate under 2 CFR 200.414(f) (relating to indirect costs), whichever is higher."Physical security assessment." A strategic evaluation of a hospital's facilities, programs and operational procedures used to identify potential security threats conducted by the Pennsylvania State Police Risk and Vulnerability Assessment Team or other professional physical security assessment experts."Rural county." A county within this Commonwealth where the population density is less than 284 persons per square mile as defined by the Center for Rural Pennsylvania."Security enhancements." The term includes:(1) Safety and security planning, including a physical security assessment.20260SB1306PN1674 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Purchase of safety and security equipment.(3) Purchase of security-related technology, which may include:(i) Metal detectors.(ii) Protective lighting.(iii) Surveillance equipment.(iv) Special emergency communications equipment.(v) Electronic locksets.(vi) Deadbolts.(vii) Trauma kits.(viii) Theft-control devices.(4) Safety and security training.(5) Threat awareness and response training.(6) Upgrades to existing structures that enhance safety and security.(7) Vulnerability and threat assessments.(8) Specialty trained canines.(9) Any other safety- or security-related project that enhances safety or security of a hospital.§ 56A02. Hospital Security Grant Fund.(a) Establishment.--The Hospital Security Grant Fund is established in the State Treasury.(b) Continuing appropriation.--All money, including accrued interest, deposited into the fund is appropriated to the commission on a continuing basis to award grants under this chapter.(c) Transfers from General Fund.--Money available to the fund shall include transfers from the General Fund as provided under subsection (d).(d) Initial transfer.--No later than 30 days after the 20260SB1306PN1674 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 effective date of this section, the Secretary of the Budget shall transfer to the fund $10,000,000 of the unexpended, unencumbered or uncommitted prior year funds that were originally appropriated from the General Fund to any executive branch agency which is subject to the policy, supervision and control of the Governor. The Secretary of the Budget may only make the transfer of funds if the transfer will not result in a deficit in any appropriation from which the funds are transferred. No less than 10 days prior to the transfer, the Secretary of the Budget shall send notification of the transfer in writing to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives.(e) Additional funding.--Beginning with the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the General Assembly may transfer or appropriate money to the fund.(f) Lapse of funds.--All unexpended, unencumbered or uncommitted money in the fund as of July 1, 2029, shall lapse and be transferred to the General Fund.§ 56A03. Administration.(a) Applications.--An application for a grant under this chapter shall be submitted by an eligible applicant in the form and manner prescribed by the commission.(b) Review process.--The commission shall review applications and make awards subject to subsection (c) on a rolling basis. No later than 90 days after the close of an application period, the commission, in consultation with the Governor's Office of Homeland Security, the Department of Health and the Pennsylvania State Police, shall review and approve or 20260SB1306PN1674 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 deny the application.(c) Allocation.--An eligible applicant may not receive more than $150,000 in any fiscal year.(d) Limitations.--The following shall apply to grant applications:(1) The commission may not provide grants in excess of the amount in the fund.(2) The commission may prorate the grant amount to an eligible applicant.(3) Grant money allocated from the fund shall be used to supplement and not supplant existing funding.(e) Eligible projects.--The commission may only award grants through the fund for eligible projects. Eligible applicants may only expend grant money received through the fund on eligible projects.(f) Eligibility for redevelopment assistance capital project.--An eligible project which receives a grant under this chapter may be the subject of an award for a redevelopment assistance capital project under Chapter 3 of the act of February 9, 1999 (P.L.1, No.1), known as the Capital Facilities Debt Enabling Act. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to modify the eligibility requirements for redevelopment assistance capital projects under the Capital Facilities Debt Enabling Act.(g) Prioritization.--In awarding grants, the commission shall prioritize applications from eligible applicants that:(1) have experienced reported incidents of violence or threats against their facility or staff and for eligible projects that would address findings from a recently completed physical security assessment; or20260SB1306PN1674 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) are located in a designated medically underserved area in a rural county.(h) Indirect costs.--An eligible applicant may not expend more than 10% of money awarded under this chapter on indirect costs.(i) Administrative expenses.--The commission may not expend more than 3% of money appropriated to the commission for the program on administrative expenses.§ 56A04. Expiration.This chapter shall expire July 1, 2031.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1306PN1674 - 6 - 1234567891011